North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-32 Penalties and Sentencing
12.1-32-13.1.
Juveniles — Sentencing — Reduction.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a court may reduce a term of imprisonment imposed upon a defendant convicted as an adult for an offense committed and completed before the defendant was eighteen years of age if:

The defendant has served at least twenty years in custody for the offense;

The defendant filed a motion for reduction in sentence; and

The court has considered the factors provided in this section and determined the defendant is not a danger to the safety of any other individual, and the interests of justice warrant a sentence modification.

A defendant whose sentence is reduced under this section must be ordered to serve a period of supervised release of at least five years upon release from imprisonment. The conditions of supervised release and any modification or revocation of the term of supervised release must be in accordance with this chapter.

When determining whether to reduce a term of imprisonment under this section, the court shall consider:

The factors provided in section 12.1-32-04, including the nature of the offense;

The age of the defendant at the time of the offense;

A report and recommendation from the department of corrections and rehabilitation, including information relating to the defendant’s ability to comply with the rules of the institution and whether the defendant completed any educational, vocational, or other prison programming;

A report and recommendation from the state’s attorney for any county in which the defendant was prosecuted;

Whether the defendant has demonstrated maturity, rehabilitation, and a fitness to re-enter society sufficient to justify a sentence reduction;

A statement by a victim or a family member of a victim who was impacted by the actions of the defendant;

A report of a physical, mental, or psychiatric examination of the defendant conducted by a licensed health care professional;

The defendant’s family and community circumstances at the time of the offense, including any history of abuse, trauma, or involvement in the child welfare system;

The role of the defendant in the offense and whether an adult also was involved in the offense;

The diminished culpability of juveniles compared to adults and the level of maturity and failure to appreciate the risks and consequences; and

Any additional information the court determines relevant.

A defendant may make a second motion for a reduction in sentence under this section no earlier than five years after the initial motion for reduction.

A defendant may make a final motion for a reduction in sentence no earlier than five years after the order for a second motion was filed.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 109, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

12.1-32-14.
Restoration of property or other work to be required of certain offenders.

Other provisions of this chapter notwithstanding, whenever a person convicted of criminal mischief is placed on probation pursuant to section 12.1-32-02 or 12.1-32-07, the court shall include as a condition of that probation the requirement that the person perform restoration or other assigned work as specified in subdivision e of subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-07.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 121, § 1; 1989, ch. 158, § 9; 1993, ch. 130, § 2.

12.1-32-15.
Offenders against children and sexual offenders — Sexually violent predators — Registration requirement — Penalty. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

As used in this section:

“A crime against a child” means a violation of chapter 12.1-16, section 12.1-17-01.1 if the victim is under the age of twelve, 12.1-17-02, 12.1-17-04, subdivision a of subsection 6 of section 12.1-17-07.1, section 12.1-18-01, 12.1-18-02, 12.1-18-05, chapter 12.1-29, or section 14-09-22, subsection 3 of section 12.1-41-02, subsection 3 of section 12.1-41-03, or an equivalent offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of another country, in which the victim is a minor or is otherwise of the age required for the act to be a crime or an attempt or conspiracy to commit these offenses.

“Department” means the department of corrections and rehabilitation.

“Homeless” means an individual who is physically present in this state, but is living in a park, under a bridge, on the streets, in a vehicle or camper, or is otherwise without a traditional dwelling, and also one who resides in this state but does not maintain a permanent address. The term does not include individuals who are temporarily domiciled or individuals residing in public or private shelters that provide temporary living accommodations.

“Mental abnormality” means a congenital or acquired condition of an individual that affects the emotional or volitional capacity of the individual in a manner that predisposes that individual to the commission of criminal sexual acts to a degree that makes the individual a menace to the health and safety of other individuals.

“Predatory” means an act directed at a stranger or at an individual with whom a relationship has been established or promoted for the primary purpose of victimization.

“Reside” means to live permanently or be situated for a considerable time in a home or a particular place.

“Sexual offender” means a person who has pled guilty to or been found guilty, including juvenile delinquent adjudications, of a violation of section 12.1-20-03, 12.1-20-03.1, 12.1-20-04, 12.1-20-05, 12.1-20-05.1, 12.1-20-06, 12.1-20-06.1, 12.1-20-07 except for subdivision a of subsection 1, 12.1-20-11, 12.1-20-12.1, 12.1-20-12.2, 12.1-20-12.3 except for subdivision a of subsection 1 and subdivision b of subsection 1 if the offense involves only a demand for money, chapter 12.1-27.2, subsection 2 of section 12.1-22-03.1, subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 12.1-41-02, section 12.1-41-04, 12.1-41-05, or 12.1-41-06, or an equivalent offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of another country, or an attempt or conspiracy to commit these offenses.

“Sexually dangerous individual” means an individual who meets the definition specified in section 25-03.3-01.

“Temporarily domiciled” means staying or being physically present in this state for more than thirty days in a calendar year or at a location for longer than ten consecutive days, attending school for longer than ten days, or maintaining employment in the jurisdiction for longer than ten days, regardless of the state of the residence.

The court shall impose, in addition to any penalty provided by law, a requirement that the individual register, within three days of coming into a county in which the individual resides, is homeless, or within the period identified in this section that the individual becomes temporarily domiciled. The individual must register with the chief of police of the city of the individual’s place of residence, or the sheriff of the county if the individual resides in an area other than a city. A homeless individual shall register every three days with the sheriff or chief of police of the jurisdiction in which the individual is physically present. The court shall require an individual to register by stating this requirement on the court records, if that individual:

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty as a felonious sexual offender or an attempted felonious sexual offender, including juvenile delinquent adjudications of equivalent offenses unless the offense is listed in subdivision c.

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty as a sexual offender for, a misdemeanor or attempted misdemeanor. The court may deviate from requiring an individual to register if the court first finds the individual is no more than three years older than the victim if the victim is a minor, the individual has not previously been convicted as a sexual offender or of a crime against a child, and the individual did not exhibit mental abnormality or predatory conduct in the commission of the offense.

Is a juvenile found delinquent under subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 12.1-20-03, subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 12.1-20-03, or as a sexual offender for a misdemeanor. The court may deviate from requiring the juvenile to register if the court first finds the juvenile has not previously been convicted as a sexual offender or for a crime against a child, and the juvenile did not exhibit mental abnormality or predatory conduct in the commission of the offense.

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, a crime against a child or an attempted crime against a child, including juvenile delinquent adjudications of equivalent offenses. Except if the offense is described in section 12.1-29-02, or section 12.1-18-01 or 12.1-18-02 and the person is not the parent of the victim, the court may deviate from requiring an individual to register if the court first finds the individual has not previously been convicted as a sexual offender or for a crime against a child, and the individual did not exhibit mental abnormality or predatory conduct in the commission of the offense.

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere, been found guilty, or been adjudicated delinquent of any crime against another individual which is not otherwise specified in this section if the court determines that registration is warranted by the nature of the crime and therefore orders registration for the individual. If the court orders an individual to register as an offender under this section, the individual shall comply with all of the registration requirements in this chapter.

If a court has not ordered an individual to register in this state, an individual who resides, is homeless, or is temporarily domiciled in this state shall register if the individual:

Is incarcerated or is on probation or parole after July 31, 1995, for a crime against a child described in section 12.1-29-02, or section 12.1-18-01 or 12.1-18-02 if the individual was not the parent of the victim, or as a sexual offender;

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been adjudicated for or found guilty of, an offense in a court of this state for which registration is mandatory under this section or an offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of another country equivalent to those offenses set forth in this section; or

Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or has been found guilty of, a crime against a child or as a sexual offender for which registration is mandatory under this section if the conviction occurred after July 31, 1985.

In its consideration of mental abnormality or predatory conduct, the court shall consider the age of the offender, the age of the victim, the difference in ages of the victim and offender, the circumstances and motive of the crime, the relationship of the victim and offender, and the mental state of the offender. The court may order an offender to be evaluated by a qualified counselor, psychologist, or physician before sentencing. Except as provided under subdivision e of subsection 2, the court shall state on the record in open court its affirmative finding for not requiring an offender to register.

When an individual is required to register under this section, the official in charge of a facility or institution where the individual required to register is confined, or the department, shall, before the discharge, parole, or release of that individual, inform the individual of the duty to register pursuant to this section. The official or the department shall require the individual to read and sign a form as required by the attorney general, stating that the duty of the individual to register has been explained to that individual. The official in charge of the place of confinement, or the department, shall obtain the address where the individual expects to reside, attend school, or work upon discharge, parole, or release and shall report the address to the attorney general. The official in charge of the place of confinement, or the department, shall give three copies of the form to the individual and shall send three copies to the attorney general no later than forty-five days before the scheduled release of that individual. The attorney general shall forward one copy to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the individual expects to reside, attend school, or work upon discharge, parole, or release, one copy to the prosecutor who prosecuted the individual, and one copy to the court in which the individual was prosecuted. All forms must be transmitted and received by the law enforcement agency, prosecutor, and court thirty days before the discharge, parole, or release of the individual.

An individual who is required to register pursuant to this section who is released on probation or discharged upon payment of a fine must, before the release or discharge, be informed of the duty to register under this section by the court in which that individual is convicted. The court shall require the individual to read and sign a form as required by the attorney general, stating that the duty of the individual to register under this section has been explained to that individual. The court shall obtain the address where the individual expects to reside, attend school, or work upon release or discharge and shall report the address to the attorney general within three days. The court shall give one copy of the form to the individual and shall send two copies to the attorney general. The attorney general shall forward one copy to the appropriate law enforcement agency having jurisdiction where the individual expects to reside, attend school, or work upon discharge, parole, or release.

Registration consists of a written or electronic statement signed by the individual, giving the information required by the attorney general, and the biometric data and photograph of the individual. An individual who is not required to provide a sample of blood and other body fluids under section 31-13-03 or by the individual’s state or court of conviction or adjudication shall submit a sample of blood and other body fluids for inclusion in a centralized database of DNA identification records under section 31-13-05. The collection, submission, testing and analysis of, and records produced from, samples of blood and other body fluids, are subject to chapter 31-13. Evidence of the DNA profile comparison is admissible in accordance with section 31-13-02. A report of the DNA analysis certified by the state crime laboratory is admissible in accordance with section 31-13-05. A district court shall order an individual who refuses to submit a sample of blood or other body fluids for registration purposes to show cause at a specified time and place why the individual should not be required to submit the sample required under this subsection. Within three days after registration, the registering law enforcement agency shall forward the statement, biometric data, and photograph to the attorney general and shall submit the sample of the individual’s blood and body fluids to the state crime laboratory. If an individual required to register under this section has a change in vehicle or computer online identity, the individual shall register, within three days after the change, with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the individual’s place of residence of the individual’s new vehicle or computer online identity. If an individual required to register pursuant to this section has a change in name, school, or residence or employment address, that individual shall register, at least ten days before the change, with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the individual’s place of residence of the individual’s new name, school, residence address, or employment address. A change in school or employment address includes the termination of school or employment for which an individual required to register under this section, the individual shall register within three days of the termination with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the individual’s place of residence. The law enforcement agency, within three days after receipt of the information, shall forward it to the attorney general. The attorney general shall forward the appropriate registration data to the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the new place of residence, school, or employment. Upon a change of address, the individual required to register also shall register within three days at the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction of the new place of residence. If an individual required to register in North Dakota, including in a tribal registry, resides in another state or on tribal lands, that individual shall register employment and school addresses and any changes in required registration information with the law enforcement agency having local jurisdiction over the school or employment address. The individual registering under this section shall periodically confirm the information required under this subsection in a manner and at an interval determined by the attorney general. A law enforcement agency that has previously registered an offender may omit the biometric data portion of the registration if that agency has a set of biometric data on file for that individual and is personally familiar with and can visually identify the offender. These provisions also apply in any other state that requires registration.

An individual required to register under this section shall comply with the registration requirement for the longer of the following periods:

A period of fifteen years after the date of sentence or order deferring or suspending sentence upon a plea or finding of guilt or after release from incarceration, whichever is later;

A period of twenty-five years after the date of sentence or order deferring or suspending sentence upon a plea or finding of guilt or after release from incarceration, whichever is later, if the offender is assigned a moderate risk by the attorney general as provided in subsection 12; or

For the life of the individual, if that individual:

On two or more occasions has pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of a crime against a child or as a sexual offender. If all qualifying offenses are misdemeanors, this lifetime provision does not apply unless a qualifying offense was committed after August 1, 1999;

Pleads guilty or nolo contendere to, or is found guilty of, an offense committed after August 1, 1999, which is described in subdivision a of subsection 1 of section 12.1-20-03, section 12.1-20-03.1, or subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 12.1-20-03 if the person is an adult and the victim is under age twelve, or section 12.1-18-01 if that individual is an adult other than a parent of the victim, or an equivalent offense from another court in the United States, a tribal court, or court of another country; or

Is assigned a high risk by the attorney general as provided in subsection 12.

An individual required to register under this section who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony. The failure of a homeless individual to register as required in subsections 2 and 3 is prima facie evidence of a violation of this section. The clerk of court shall forward all warrants issued for a violation of this section to the county sheriff, who shall enter all such warrants into the national crime information center wanted person file. A court may not relieve an individual, other than a juvenile, who violates this section from serving a term of at least ninety days in jail and completing probation of one year.

When an individual is released on parole or probation and is required to register pursuant to this section, but fails to do so within the time prescribed, the court shall order the probation, or the parole board shall order the parole, of the individual revoked.

If an individual required to register pursuant to this section is temporarily sent outside the facility or institution where that individual is confined under conviction or sentence, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the place where that individual is being sent must be notified within a reasonable time period before that individual is released from the facility or institution. This subsection does not apply to any individual temporarily released under guard from the facility or institution in which that individual is confined.

The attorney general, with the assistance of the department and the juvenile courts, shall develop guidelines for the risk assessment of sexual offenders who are required to register, with a low-risk, moderate-risk, or high-risk level being assigned to each offender as follows:

The department shall conduct a risk assessment of sexual offenders who are incarcerated in institutions under the control of the department and sexual offenders who are on supervised probation. The department, in a timely manner, shall provide the attorney general any information, including the offender’s level of risk and supporting documentation, concerning individuals required to be registered under this section who are about to be released or placed into the community.

The attorney general shall conduct a risk assessment of sexual offenders who are not under the custody or supervision of the department. The attorney general may adopt a law enforcement agency’s previous assignment of risk level for an individual if the assessment was conducted in a manner substantially similar to the guidelines developed under this subsection.

The juvenile courts or the agency having legal custody of a juvenile shall conduct a risk assessment of juvenile sexual offenders who are required to register under this section. The juvenile courts or the agency having legal custody of a juvenile shall provide the attorney general any information, including the offender’s level of risk and supporting documentation, concerning juveniles required to register and who are about to be released or placed into the community.

The attorney general shall notify the offender of the risk level assigned to that offender. An offender may request a review of that determination with the attorney general’s sexual offender risk assessment committee and may present any information that the offender believes may lower the assigned risk level.

An individual assessed as a high-risk sexual offender in accordance with subsection 12, may not reside within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of a public or nonpublic preschool or elementary, middle, or high school.

Relevant and necessary conviction and registration information must be disclosed to the public by a law enforcement agency if the individual is a moderate or high risk and the agency determines that disclosure of the conviction and registration information is necessary for public protection. The attorney general shall develop guidelines for public disclosure of offender registration information. Public disclosure may include internet access if the offender:

Is required to register for a lifetime under subsection 8;

Has been determined to be a high risk to the public by the department, the attorney general, or the courts, according to guidelines developed by those agencies; or

Has been determined to be a high risk to the public by an agency of another state or the federal government.

A state officer, law enforcement agency, or public school district or governing body of a nonpublic school or any appointee, officer, or employee of those entities is not subject to civil or criminal liability for making risk determinations, allowing a sexual offender to attend a school function under section 12.1-20-25, or for disclosing or for failing to disclose information as permitted by this section.

If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent and required or ordered to register as a sexual offender or as an offender against a child under this section, the juvenile shall comply with the registration requirements in this section. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a law enforcement agency shall register a juvenile offender in the same manner as adult offenders and may release any relevant and necessary information on file to other law enforcement agencies, the department of human services, or the public if disclosure is necessary to protect public health or safety. The law enforcement agency shall release any relevant and necessary information on file to the superintendent or principal of the school the juvenile attends. The school administration shall notify others in similar positions if the juvenile transfers to another learning institution in or outside the state.

If an individual has been required to register as a sexual offender or an offender against a child under section 12.1-32-15 or former section 27-20-52.1 before August 1, 1999, the individual may petition the court to be removed from the offender list if registration is no longer mandatory for that individual. In considering the petition, the court shall comply with the requirements of this section.

A sexual offender who is currently assigned a moderate or high-risk level by the attorney general may not use a state park of this state as a residence or residential address to comply with the registration requirements of this section. Before arriving at a state park for overnight lodging or camping, a sexual offender who is assigned a moderate or high-risk level by the attorney general shall notify a parks and recreation department law enforcement officer at the state park where the sexual offender will be staying.

When an individual who is required to register pursuant to this section plans to travel outside of the United States, at least twenty-one days before the intended travel, the individual shall inform the agency with which the individual last registered the individual’s residence address the details of the intended travel. Upon receipt of the information from the registering law enforcement agency, the attorney general shall report the travel to the United States marshal service.

If the offender has been determined to be a moderate risk, public disclosure must include, at a minimum, notification of the offense to the victim registered under chapter 12.1-34 and to any agency, civic organization, or group of persons who have characteristics similar to those of a victim of the offender. Upon request, law enforcement agencies may release conviction and registration information regarding low-risk, moderate-risk, or high-risk offenders.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 136, § 1; 1993, ch. 129, § 3; 1995, ch. 139, § 1; 1997, ch. 124, § 5; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 1997, ch. 136, § 1; 1997, ch. 137, § 1; 1999, ch. 50, § 33; 1999, ch. 123, § 3; 1999, ch. 131, § 1; 2001, ch. 134, § 8; 2001, ch. 140, § 1; 2001 Sp., ch. 690, § 1; 2003, ch. 113, § 1; 2005, ch. 121, § 1; 2007, ch. 124, § 4; 2007, ch. 136, § 1; 2009, ch. 121, §
2; 2009, ch. 136, § 1; 2009, ch. 137, §
1; 2009, ch. 139, §
3; 2011, ch. 103, § 1; 2011, ch. 102, §§ 1, 2; 2013, ch. 113, § 1; 2015, ch. 96, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 115, § 1, effective April 8, 2015; 2015, ch. 117, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 127, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 110, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 112, § 1; 2017, ch. 111, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 108, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 120, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 245, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 12.1-32-15 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 22 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 2 of Chapter 245, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1035.

Section 12.1-22-03.1, referred to in this section, was repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 134, § 11. For present provisions see 12.1-20-12.2.

Section 27-20-52.1, referred to in subsection 16, was repealed by S.L. 1999, chapter 131, § 2.

The amendments to subsections 2 and 7 become effective on the date the attorney general certifies to the legislative council that the registration process provided in subsections 2 and 7 is operational.